Georgia statutes. TITLE 39 Minors
CHAPTER 3 Interstate Compact on Juveniles

Law reviews.

For article, “Interstate Cooperative Institutionalization — A Modern Device for Rehabilitation,” see 8 J. of Pub. L. 509 (1959).

For article, “The Interstate Compact on Juveniles: Development and Operation,” see 8 J. of Pub. L. 524 (1959).

39-3-1 through 39-3-7.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 784, §§ 1-7; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1070, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2014, p. 763, § 1-1/HB 898, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 763, § 1-1/HB 898 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2014.